Vermont, session 2025-2026, H25.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 23 V.S.A. § 1209a is amended to read:
§ 1209a. CONDITIONS OF REINSTATEMENT; ALCOHOL AND
DRIVING EDUCATION; SCREENING; THERAPY PROGRAMS
(a) Conditions of reinstatement. No license or privilege to operate
suspended or revoked under this subchapter, except a license or privilege to
operate suspended under section 1216 of this title, shall be reinstated except as
follows:
(1) In the case of a first suspension, a license or privilege to operate
shall be reinstated only:
(A) after the individual has successfully completed the Alcohol and
Driving Education Program, at the individual’s own expense, followed by an
assessment of the need for further treatment by a State-designated counselor, at
the individual’s own expense, to determine whether reinstatement should be
further conditioned on satisfactory completion of a therapy program agreed to
by the individual and the Drinking Impaired Driver Rehabilitation Program
Director;
(B) if the screening indicates that therapy is needed, after the
individual has satisfactorily completed or shown substantial progress in
completing a therapy program at the individual’s own expense agreed to by the
individual and the Impaired Driver Rehabilitation Program Director;
VT LEG #379217 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.25
2025 Page 3 of 5
(C) if the individual elects to operate under an ignition interlock RDL
or ignition interlock certificate, after the individual operates under the RDL or
certificate for the applicable period set forth in subsection 1205(a) or section
1206 of this title, plus any extension of this period arising from a violation of
section 1213 of this title; and
(D) if the individual has no pending criminal charges, civil citations,
or unpaid fines or penalties for a violation under this chapter.
* * *
(f) Fees.
(1)(A) The Department of Health’s Drinking Impaired Driver
Rehabilitation Program shall assess fees for the Alcohol and Driving Education
Program and the alcohol assessment screening required by subdivision
(a)(1)(A) of this section. The fee for the Alcohol and Driving Education
Program shall not exceed $250.00. The fee for the alcohol assessment
screening shall not exceed $200.00. In the case of a more intensive or
weekend residential program combining both the Alcohol and Driving
Education Program and the alcohol assessment screening, the total charge shall
not exceed $625.00.
(B) The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles and the Department of
Health’s Impaired Driver Rehabilitation Program shall engage in education and
VT LEG #379217 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.25
2025 Page 4 of 5
outreach to ensure that individuals eligible to enroll in the Program are aware
of any required fees and any potential fee discounts.
(2)(A) Upon an individual’s request, any discounted fees charged
pursuant to this subsection (f) shall consider the individual’s annual gross
income prior to imposing such a fee.
(B) The Commissioner shall adopt rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter
25 establishing a graduated fee schedule bearing a reasonable relationship to an
individual’s gross income. An individual shall be found eligible for a program
fee reduction based upon the federal poverty level.
(i) An individual with an annual gross income of less than or equal
to 175 percent of the current federal poverty guidelines shall not pay any
program fees.
(ii) An individual with an annual gross income of up to and
including 575 percent of the current federal poverty guidelines shall be eligible
for discounted program fees.
(C) An individual seeking a fee reduction to enroll in any program or
screening under this section shall disclose the individual’s gross income. Any
income information disclosed by the individual shall remain confidential and
be solely used for the purpose of assessing any fee reduction for the individual
as required by this subsection (f).
VT LEG #379217 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.25
2025 Page 5 of 5
(3) Charges collected under this section shall be credited to separate
special funds for each type of service and shall be available to the Department
of Health to offset the cost of operating the Drinking Impaired Driver
Rehabilitation Program.
Sec. 2. RULE IMPLEMENTATION DATE
The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall adopt the rules required by this
act on or before January 1, 2026.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379217 v.1